Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB704.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Neurodegenerative Disease Research Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Biorepository." An entity that receives, stores, processes or disseminates biospecimens, the derivatives of biospecimens or 1234567891011121314 relevant data regarding biospecimens."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." An institution engaged in neurodegenerative disease research."Fund." The Neurodegenerative Disease Research Program Fund established under section 5(a)."Institution." Any of the following located in this Commonwealth:(1) An academic clinical research entity that conducts neurodegenerative disease research.(2) An institution of higher education that conducts neurodegenerative disease research."INSTITUTION." AN ACADEMIC CLINICAL MEDICAL CENTER LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH THAT CONDUCTS NEURODEGENERATIVE DISEASE RESEARCH."Neurodegenerative disease." Conditions characterized by the progressive loss of nerve cells in the brain or spinal cord, leading to functional decline and often resulting in debilitating conditions such as dementia or movement disorders, including, but not limited to, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, Alzheimer's disease, Huntington's disease or Parkinson's disease."Neurodegenerative disease research." Health research on neurodegenerative diseases. The term includes:(1) Biomedical research.(2) Clinical research.(3) Health services research.(4) Research regarding the establishment of a Statewide biorepository.(5) Research regarding a Statewide tissue bank.20250HB0704PN1713 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Program." The Neurodegenerative Disease Research Program established under section 3(a)."Tissue bank." An entity that is licensed, accredited or regulated under Federal or State law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage or distribution of tissue.Section 3. Neurodegenerative Disease Research Program.(a) Establishment.--The Neurodegenerative Disease Research Program is established within the department.(b) Purpose.--The program shall provide grants to eligible applicants to fund neurodegenerative disease research projects on neurodegenerative disease and related infrastructure.(c) Administration.--The department shall implement and administer the program in accordance with this act.(d) Application form.--(1) The department shall develop an application form which must be completed and approved before an eligible applicant can receive a grant under the program.(2) The application form under this subsection must include:(i) Eligibility criteria to receive a grant under the program.(ii) Deadlines for submittal of a completed application form.(iii) Information to be submitted with a completed application, including:(A) Contact information.(B) Proof of eligibility for a grant under the program.(C) The purpose and amount of the requested 20250HB0704PN1713 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grant under the program.(iv) Certification that the proposed research has undergone appropriate Institutional Review Board review, INSTITUTIONAL ANIMAL CARE AND USE COMMITTEE REVIEW and peer review as necessary.(3) The department shall post the application form under this subsection on its publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Determination.--The department shall develop a process for:(1) The submittal and review of a completed application form for grants under the program, including a timeline for making a determination on the application and notice of the award of grants under the program.(2) The disbursement of grants under the program to eligible applicants, including any limit on the amount of a grant disbursed to an eligible applicant.(3) The general administration of the program, including the maintenance of records regarding the program.(f) Reports.--Within 90 days after the grant period ends, each recipient shall submit a report to the department which shall include:(1) The progress made in achieving expected research goals and objectives.(2) Any major discoveries, new drugs and new approaches for prevention, diagnosis and treatment which are attributable to the completed research project.(3) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.Section 4. Funding formula.(a) Eligibility.--If an institution has received funding for 20250HB0704PN1713 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 neurodegenerative disease research from the National Institutes of Health OR THE PATIENT-CENTERED OUTCOMES RESEARCH INSTITUTE during any of the four preceding Federal fiscal years in which money for that research was disbursed, the institution shall be eligible to receive a grant under the program.(b) Fund distribution.--Money to be distributed to each eligible applicant shall be calculated by dividing the total number of eligible applicants by the total amount appropriated in a fiscal year.(C) FUNDING LIMITATIONS.--INDIRECT COSTS SHALL BE CAPPED AT 10% OF GRANT FUNDS.Section 5. Neurodegenerative Disease Research Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Neurodegenerative Disease Research Program Fund is established in the State Treasury to carry out the purposes of the program.(b) Operation.--All money deposited into the fund and interest and other earnings on the money in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to award grants under the program.(c) Fund sources.--The department may solicit and accept funding for the program, including money appropriated by the General Assembly, Federal money, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source, which shall be deposited into the fund.Section 6. Accountability.An eligible institution that receives a grant under the program shall be subject to a performance review by the department upon completion of a neurodegenerative disease research project or more often as deemed necessary by the department. The performance review shall be based on an 20250HB0704PN1713 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evaluation process by the department.Section 7. Reports.(a) Annual reports required.--No later than September 1, 2025, DECEMBER 31 OF THE YEAR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION and each September 1 DECEMBER 31 thereafter, the department shall issue an annual report detailing the operation of the program and fund during the preceding year.(b) Contents.--Each annual report under this section must include the following:(1) The number of eligible applicants that sought a grant under the program.(2) The amount of the grant that each eligible applicant received under the program.(3) The number of applicants that were denied, in whole or in part, a grant under the program, including the reasons for the full or partial denial.(4) The money remaining in the fund.(5) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.(c) Transmittal.--Each annual report under this section shall be transmitted to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(5) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.20250HB0704PN1713 - 6 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(9) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE HEALTH COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(d) Posting.--The department shall post each annual report under this section on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.Section 8. Rules and regulations.The department shall adopt or promulgate rules or regulations necessary to implement and administer this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0704PN1713 - 7 - <--123456789101112